Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 39.1 The Holders of Low and Moderate Income Housing Restrictions Act

34-39.1-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as “The Holders of Low and Moderate Income Housing Restrictions Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 237, § 1.

34-39.1-2.
Legislative purpose.

The general assembly recognizes and declares that there exists in the state of Rhode Island a serious shortage of decent, safe and sanitary housing units available and affordable to persons and families of low and moderate income. The inadequacy in the supply of decent, safe, and sanitary affordable housing endangers the public health and jeopardizes the public safety, general welfare, and good of the entire state. To obtain the benefits of restrictions which seek to preserve and maintain affordable housing, the general assembly does hereby grant special status to the restrictions so a restriction holder may enforce the restrictions without uncertainty as to the legal effect and enforceability of the restrictions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 237, § 1.

34-39.1-3.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Housing restriction” means any obligation or requirement to maintain real estate affordable for rental to or purchase by low and moderate income citizens of the state or any limitation on the future use or transfer of the real estate, whether stated in the form of a charge, encumbrance, financing instrument, easement, covenant, or condition in any deed, agreement, or other instrument executed by or on behalf of the owner of the real estate.

“Restriction holder” means any nonprofit corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or trust established for the primary purpose of owning, operating, leasing, preserving, or maintaining housing affordable to persons and families of low and moderate income, and entities that provide financing, land, or other benefits related to the development and preservation of affordable housing including, but not limited to, state agencies, municipalities, foundations, Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, and public housing authorities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 4.

34-39.1-4.
Housing restrictions enforceable.

No housing restriction, whether presently existing or hereafter created, that is held by a restriction holder shall be unenforceable against an owner or assignee of any real estate subject to the housing restriction because of lack of privity of estate or contract, or lack of benefit to particular land, or on account of any other common law doctrine of property law which might cause the termination of the housing restriction.

This section shall not be construed to imply that restriction, charge, encumbrance, easement, covenant, or condition which is not covered hereunder shall, on account of any provisions hereof, be unenforceable.

A housing restriction as defined in § 34-39.1-3(a) shall not be subject to the thirty (30) year limitation on restricted covenants provided for in §

34-4-21

.

A housing restriction as defined in subsection 34-39.1-3(a) shall not be subject to any of the limitations on possibilities of reverter and rights of entry or expirations or invalidity of restrictive covenants provided for in §

34-4-19

,

34-4-20

,

34-4-22

,

34-4-23

or

34-4-26

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 4.

34-39.1-5.
Interests in real estate.

Housing restrictions are interests in real estate and may be assigned by the party that holds the housing restriction to any other restriction holder. A document creating a restriction shall be deemed a conveyance of real estate for purposes of chapters 11 and 13 of this title. A restriction may be enforced by an action at law or by injunction or other proceedings in equity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 237, § 1.

34-39.1-6.
Invalidity of certain restrictive covenants.

Since decent, safe and sanitary housing units available and affordable to persons and families of low and moderate income must by their nature be situated in residential areas, including exclusively residential areas and also mixed use areas, any restrictive covenant or other private legal impediment which directly or indirectly prevents or restricts the establishment of housing subject to a housing restriction as defined in this chapter, excluding conservation restrictions and preservation restrictions as defined in §

34-39-2

, shall be void and unenforceable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 368, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 464, § 5.